District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.80

Appropriations authorized.

There is hereby authorized to be appropriated out of the General Fund of the District of Columbia such sums as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 139, ch. 222, § 80
1981 Ed., § 40-479.
1973 Ed., § 40-495.